North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62. Public Utilities.
Article 11. Railroads. [Repealed]

§ 62-220.

Recodified as G.S. 136-190 by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 14.

§§ 62-221,
62-222.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 13.

§§ 62-223 through 62-226.

Recodified as G.S. 136-191 through 136-194 by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 14.

§§ 62-227 through 62-234.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 13.

§ 62-235.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 673, s. 3.

§ 62-236.

Recodified as G.S. 136-20.1 by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 673, s. 5.

§ 62-237.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 136-195 by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 14, effective September 4, 1998.

§§ 62-238,
62-239.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 13, effective September 4, 1998.

§ 62-240.

Recodified as G.S. 136-196 by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 14, effective September 4, 1998.

§§ 62-241 through 62-247.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-128, s. 13, effective September 4, 1998.

§§ 62-248 through 62-258.

Reserved for future codification purposes.